California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(III) If, after disregarding the fractional vote points and adding just the whole vote points, the total vote points for all jurisdictions is less than 100, the difference in vote points shall be allocated to jurisdictions in order of the highest fractions until a total of 100 vote points are allocated, excepting those jurisdictions whose vote was increased to one pursuant to subclause (I).

(IV) If, after disregarding the fractional vote points and adding just the whole vote points, the total vote points for all jurisdictions is more than 100, the vote points in excess of 100 shall be eliminated
 by subtracting vote points from jurisdictions with the lowest percentage to the total population or the region except that no jurisdiction’s vote points shall be reduced to less than one.

(C) When a weighted vote is taken on any item that requires more than a majority vote of the board, it shall also require the same supermajority percentage of the weighted vote.

(D) The allocation of vote points pursuant to this subdivision shall be made annually by the board of directors based upon the population calculations made by the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG).

(E) Any other newly incorporated city shall be added to the jurisdiction designated by SANDAG. The board member representing that jurisdiction shall receive
 one additional vote under the weighted vote procedure specified above until the next allocation of vote points pursuant to subparagraph (D), at which time the new jurisdiction shall receive votes in accordance with the formula specified in this paragraph. Until this next vote points allocation, the total number of weighted vote points may exceed 100.

(e) Any act to submit a ballot measure to the voters at a regular or special election shall require a two-thirds majority vote, both numerically and by weighted vote, of the total voting membership of the board of directors.

(f) The board of directors shall keep a record of all of its actions, including financial transactions.

(g) The board of directors shall adopt
 rules or bylaws for its proceedings.

(h) The board of directors shall adopt policies for the operation of the authority, including, but not limited to, ethical standards and practices, administrative policies, fiscal policies, personnel policies, and purchasing policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 7.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170016.

(a) The board of directors may adopt and enforce rules and regulations for the administration, maintenance, operation, and use of its facilities and services.

(b) A person who violates a rule, regulation, or ordinance adopted by the board of directors is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable pursuant to Section 19 of the Penal Code, or an infraction under the circumstances set forth in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 17 of the Penal Code.

(c) A rule, regulation, or ordinance of the authority may be enforced in an administrative action. A civil penalty may be imposed if the administrative action results in a finding that a violation has taken place.

(d) The authority may employ necessary personnel to enforce this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

170017.

(a) The board of directors may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each of its members may receive compensation in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for each day of service. A member of the board of directors shall not receive compensation for more than eight days of service a month. A member of the board of directors shall not receive compensation for being present at more than one meeting, hearing, event, or training program on each day of service. A board member shall be present for at least half of the time set for the meeting, or for the duration of the meeting, whichever is less, in order to be eligible for compensation.

(b) By a two-thirds vote of the majority, the board of directors may, by ordinance or resolution, modify the amount of compensation provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The board of directors, by ordinance or resolution, may provide for the chair to receive an amount, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) a month, in addition to all other compensation provided pursuant to this section.

(d) The board of directors may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that its members may receive their actual and necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred while on official business. Reimbursement of these expenses is subject to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, except that the provisions of this section shall prevail over the provisions of Section 53232.1 of the Government Code to the extent of any conflict.

(e) The members of the board of directors shall not receive, in compensation, any benefits permitted to be paid to members of legislative bodies pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 53200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. This subdivision does not prohibit a member of the board of directors from electing to participate in a plan of health and welfare benefits if the costs of those benefits are paid by the board member and the authority incurs no expense other than those expenses associated with processing the application of the board member seeking the benefits.

(f) A member of the board of directors may waive any or all of the payments permitted by this section.

(g) For the purposes of this section, a “day of service” means any of the following:

(1) A meeting of the authority conducted pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) Representation of the authority at a public event, if the board of directors has previously approved the member’s representation at a board of directors’ meeting and the member delivers a written report to the board of directors regarding the member’s representation at the next board of directors’ meeting following the public event.

(3) Representation of the authority at a public meeting or a public hearing conducted by another public agency, if the board of directors has previously approved the member’s representation at a board of directors’ meeting and the member delivers a written report to the board of directors regarding the member’s representation at the next board of directors’ meeting following the public meeting or public hearing.

(4) Representation of the authority at a meeting of a public benefit nonprofit corporation on whose board the authority has membership, if the board of directors has previously approved the member’s representation at a board of directors’ meeting and the member delivers a written report to the board of directors regarding the member’s representation at the next board of directors’ meeting following the corporation’s meeting.

(5) Participation in a training program on a topic that is directly related to the authority, if the board of directors has previously approved the member’s participation at a board of directors’ meeting, and the member delivers a written report to the board of directors regarding the member’s participation at the next board of directors’ meeting following the training program.

(6) Representation of the authority at an official meeting, if the board of directors has previously approved the member’s representation at a meeting of the board of directors and the member delivers a written report to the board of directors regarding the member’s representation at the next meeting of the board of directors following the official meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 620, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

170018.

(a) The audit committee formed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 170013 shall be a standing committee of the board of directors. Each member of the committee shall be a voting member. The public members shall be appointed by the board of directors for staggered three-year terms.

(b) The board of directors shall select the three public members from among the following categories of persons, with no more than one appointee from each category at any one time:

(1) A professional with experience in the field of public finance and budgeting.

(2) An architect or civil engineer licensed to practice in this state.

(3) A professional with experience in the field of real estate or land economics.

(4) A person with experience in managing construction of large-scale public works projects.

(5) A person with public or private sector executive level decisionmaking experience.

(6) A person who resides within the airport influence area of the San Diego International Airport (Lindbergh Field).

(7) A person with experience in environmental justice as it pertains to land use.

(c) The board of directors may appoint other persons to serve as nonvoting, noncompensated, ex officio members on the Audit Committee.

(d) In appointing the public members of the Audit Committee, the board of directors shall provide for selection policies, appointment procedures, conflict-of-interest policies, length-of-term policies, and policies for providing compensation, if any.

(e) The Audit Committee shall serve as a guardian of the public trust, acting independently and charged with oversight responsibilities for reviewing the authority’s internal controls, financial reporting obligations, operating efficiencies, ethical behavior, and regular attention to cashflows, capital expenditures, regulatory compliance,
 and operations.

(f) The Audit Committee shall meet a minimum of four times per year and shall, at a minimum, do all the following:

(1) Regularly review the authority’s accounting, audit, and performance monitoring processes.

(2) At the time of contract renewal, recommend to the appropriate committee and the board of directors its nomination for an external auditor and the compensation of that auditor, and consider at least every three years, whether there should be a rotation of the audit firm or the lead audit partner to ensure continuing auditor independence.

(3) Advise the appropriate committee and the board of directors regarding the selection of the
 auditor.

(4) Be responsible for oversight and monitoring of internal and external audit functions, and monitoring performance of, and internal compliance with, authority policies and procedures.

(5) Be responsible for overseeing the annual audit by the external
 auditors and any internal audits.

(6) Make recommendations to the full board regarding paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive.

(g) An affirmative vote by at least five members of the Audit Committee shall be required for approval of the annual internal and external audits, including performance monitoring, the auditor’s annual audit plan for each fiscal year submitted to the board for approval, and actions recommending or approving debt financing for the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 8.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170024.

(a) Upon request of the board of directors of the authority, and with the consent of any labor organization acting as the exclusive representative of employees of the authority whose rights are governed by a collective bargaining agreement, the board may enter into a contract to enroll those employees as members of the California Public Employees’ Retirement System (CalPERS) or another retirement system.

(b) A contract to enroll employees in CalPERS shall be subject to the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code and, where permitted by the law governing that system, shall receive full
 reciprocity with public employees’ retirement systems in which they
 previously participated.

(c) Employees transferred from any existing retirement system or pension plan to CalPERS or any other retirement system by operation of this section shall receive benefits immediately after enrollment in, or transfer to, the system that are equal to the benefits the employees would have been entitled to immediately before enrollment in, or transfer to, the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 9.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170026.

(a) The board of directors shall appoint the following executive employees of the authority:

(1) Chief executive officer.

(2) General counsel.

(3) Auditor.

(b) The chief executive officer shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) The implementation of the policies established by the board of directors for the operation of the authority.

(2) The appointment, supervision, discipline, and dismissal of the authority’s other employees, including the deputy chief executive officer, consistent with the employee relations system established by the board of directors.

(3) The supervision of the authority’s facilities and services.

(4) The supervision of the authority’s finances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties [170030. - 170084.]

170030.

The authority has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170032.

(a) The authority may sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(b) All claims for money or damages against the authority are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 287, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

170034.

All the provisions of Section 120242 are applicable to the authority, and the authority may exercise those provisions within its area of jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170035.

The authority is a local agency for purposes of the California Disaster Assistance Act (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8680) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 620, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

170036.

The authority may act as a city police department, city, local government, or public agency for the purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2080) of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 620, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

170038.

The authority may take by grant, purchase, devise, or lease or otherwise acquire, hold, enjoy, lease, and dispose of, real and personal property within or outside its area of jurisdiction in order to further its purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 7.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170040.

The authority may contract with any department or agency of the United States, with any state or local governmental agency, or with any person upon those terms and conditions that the authority finds are in its best interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170044.

Except as otherwise specifically provided to the contrary in this chapter, a recorded majority vote of the total membership of the board of directors is required on each action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170048.

(a) The authority has exclusive responsibility to study, plan, and implement any improvements, expansion, or enhancements at San Diego International Airport.

(b) The authority may commission planning, engineering, economic, and other studies to provide information to the board for making decisions about the location, design, management, and other features of future airports.

(c) The San Diego Association of Governments, or its successor, shall cooperate with the authority to include all airport system plans and facilities selected by the authority in the regional transportation plan
 consistent with state and federal law.

(d) The authority, the San Diego Association of Governments, local agencies, and the Department of Transportation shall cooperate to develop effective surface transportation access to new and existing airports.

(e) The authority may adopt a comprehensive plan on the future development of San Diego’s regional international airport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 10.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170050.

The authority shall be the only agency, public or private, in the County of San Diego that is eligible to take ownership of airports owned by the United States government and are declared surplus or are otherwise made available to state or local governmental agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170052.

The authority shall be responsible for developing all aspects of airport facilities that it operates, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The location of terminals, hangars, aids to air navigation, Runway Protection Zones (RPZ), Airport Influence Areas (AIA), parking lots and structures, and all other facilities and services necessary to serve passengers and other customers of the airport.

(b) Street and highway access and egress with the objective of minimizing, to the extent practicable, traffic congestion on access routes in the vicinity of the airport.

(c) Providing for public mass transportation access in cooperation and coordination with the responsible public transportation agency in whose jurisdiction the airport is located.

(d) Analyzing and developing intercity bus and passenger rail access to terminals in cooperation with an established agency or organization experienced in developing and operating that service, if the service or the technology proposed for implementation is demonstrated to be in regular, scheduled revenue service and is demonstrated to be a cost-effective investment when considering both direct and indirect benefits. If that service is proven feasible, the authority shall endeavor to maximize the convenience of its patrons by incorporating the service into the design of its terminals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 9.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170054.

(a) The authority shall form an advisory committee to assist it in performing its responsibilities related to the planning and development of all airport facilities for the County of San Diego, including the airport activities and operations of the United States Department of Defense. In selecting members for the committee, the authority shall include persons knowledgeable about airport management, passenger and freight air transportation operations and economics, general aviation, the natural environment, regional economic development, business, including the technology sector of the economy.

(b) To the extent feasible, the advisory committee shall include representatives from the Department of Transportation, local public transit authorities, local governments, the campuses of the University of California and the California State University in the region, the United States Department of Defense, and other groups and residents of San Diego County.

(c) When forming the advisory committee, the authority shall make its selections for membership from individuals representing all elements of the County of San Diego.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170056.

The port shall transfer all title and ownership of the San Diego International Airport to the authority consistent with the terms of the transfer under Section 170060 and shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) All interest in real property and improvements, including, but not limited to, all terminals, runways, taxiways, aprons, hangars, Runway Protection Zones (RPZ), Airport Influence Areas (AIA), emergency vehicles or facilities, parking facilities for passengers and employees, above and below ground utility lines and connections, easements, rights-of-way, other rights for the use of property necessary or convenient to the use of airport properties, and buildings and facilities used to operate, maintain, and
 manage the airport which is consistent with the Airport Layout Plan (ALP) dated September 13, 2000, and identified as Drawing No. 724 on file with the clerk of the port, subject to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3).

(1) The following real properties shall not be transferred and shall remain under the ownership and control of the port:

(A) All property originally leased to General Dynamics Corporation and identified in Document No. 12301 on file with the clerk of the port.

(B) Property subleased by the port from TDY Industries, Inc., c/o Allegheny Teledyne (formerly Teledyne Ryan Aeronautical) and identified as Document No. 17600 on file with the clerk of the port.

(C) Property leased to Solar Turbines, Incorporated for parking along Pacific Highway and
 identified as Document No. 39904 on file with the clerk of the port (Parcel No. 016-026).

(D) Property leased to Solar Turbines, Incorporated, for parking along Laurel Street and identified as Document No. 29239 on file with the clerk of the port (Parcel No. 016-016 - Parcel 2).

(E) Property leased to Sky Chefs, Incorporated, located at 2450 Winship Lane and identified as Document No. 37740 on file with the clerk of the port (Parcel No. 012-025).

(F) (i) Property located at Parcel No. 034-002 and identified as Pond 20. The port shall retain ownership of Pond 20 and shall reimburse the airport fund for the fair market value of that property. The fair market value shall be determined by appraisal and negotiation. If there is no agreement following that negotiation, then the amount of payment shall
 be determined by arbitration.

(ii) On January 1, 2003, the port shall commence repayment to the airport of the negotiated or arbitrated fair market value for the property. The repayment schedule shall be a 10-year amortized payment plan with interest based upon the rate of 1 percent above the prevailing prime rate.

(2) The following additional real properties shall be transferred from the port to the authority:

(A) Property adjacent to Pond 20 located at Parcel Nos. 042-002 and 042-003 (this parcel encompasses approximately two or three acres).

(B) Property acquired as Parcel No. 034-001 from Western Salt Processing Plant and identified as Document No. 39222 from GGTW, LLC.

(3) The
 following nonairport, real properties that presently provide airport-related services shall also be excluded from any land transfer to the authority:

(A) Airport employee parking lot located at Harbor Island Drive and Harbor Island Drive East identified as District Parcel No. 007-020.

(B) Airport taxi and shuttle overflow lot located at the southeast corner of North Harbor Drive and Harbor Island Drive identified as District Parcel No. 007-025.

(C) Property leased to National Car Rental System, Incorporated, located east of the southeast corner of North Harbor Drive and Harbor Island Drive identified as District Parcel No. 007-034.

(D) Property leased to The Hertz Corporation located east of the southeast corner of North Harbor Drive and Harbor Island
 Drive identified as District Parcel No. 007-035.

(E) Property leased to Avis Rent-A-Car Corporation located at the southwest corner of North Harbor Drive and Rental Car Roadway identified as District Parcel No. 007-036.

(F) Property leased to National Car Rental System, Incorporated, located at the southeast corner of North Harbor Drive and Rental Car Roadway identified as District Parcel No. 007-038.

(G) Property leased in common to National Car Rental System, Incorporated; The Hertz Corporation; and Avis Rent-A-Car Corporation known as Joint-Use Roadway identified as District Parcel No. 007-037.

(H) Property leased to Jimsair, Incorporated, located on the property previously known as the General Dynamics Parcel, south of Sassafras Street and west of
 Pacific Highway adjacent to the Airport Operation Area identified as District Parcel No. 016-042.

(I) Property leased to Budget Rent A Car of San Diego located at both the northeast and southwest corners of Palm Street and Pacific Highway identified as District Parcel No. 016-001 (Parcel 1 and 2).

(J) Property leased to Budget Rent A Car of San Diego located east of the northeast corner of Palm Street and Pacific Highway identified as District Parcel No. 016-001 (Parcel 3).

(K) Property leased to Lichtenberger Equipment, Incorporated, located north of the northeast corner of Palm Street and Pacific Highway identified as District Parcel No. 016-034.

(L) Property leased to Park and Ride, Incorporated, located at the northeast corner of Sassafras and
 Pacific Highway identified as District Parcel No. 016-038.

(M) Property leased to Ace Parking Management, Incorporated, located north of the intersection of Sassafras Street and Pacific Highway identified as District Parcel No. 016-040.

(N) Property leased to Federal Express Corporation located at the west end of the extension of Washington Street identified as District Parcel No. 015-008.

(b) All contracts with airport tenants, concessionaires, leaseholders, and others, including, but not limited to, fees from vehicle rental companies.

(c) All airport-related financial obligations secured by revenues and fees generated from the operations of the airport, including, but not limited to, bonded indebtedness associated with the airport. The authority shall
 assume obligations issued or incurred by the port for San Diego International Airport, including, but not limited to, any long-term debt, grants, and grant assurances.

(d) All airport-related financial reserves, including, but not limited to, sinking funds and other credits.

(e) All personal property, including, but not limited to, emergency vehicles, office equipment, computers, records and files, software required for financial management, personnel management, and accounting and inventory systems, and any other personal property owned by the port used to operate or maintain the airport.

(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the port shall agree to lease for a period of 66 years, commencing on January 1, 2003, to the authority parcels 1, 2, and 3 of the property originally leased to General Dynamics
 (identified in Document No. 12301 on file with the clerk of the port) consisting of approximately 89.75 acres west of the Pacific Highway and including property leased to JimsAir (identified as Parcel #016-042), property leased to Federal Express Corporation (identified as Parcel #015-008) and the Park, Shuttle and Fly lot operated by Five Star Parking under a management agreement with the port (identified as Clerk Document No. 38334, dated March 29, 1999), subject to the following terms:

(1) The rent shall be paid monthly in arrears and the annual rent shall be level based on the fair market value of the property as of January 1, 2006, and a market rate of return on that date.

(2) The authority shall lease to the port at the same fair market value per square foot a total of not to exceed 250 parking spaces in reasonable proximity to the port’s administrative building located at
 3165 Pacific Highway with the authority having a right to relocate or substitute substantially equivalent or better parking from time to time. The parties shall first meet and confer to determine by appraisal and negotiation the fair market value rent. If the authority and port do not reach agreement within 60 days after commencement of meetings for that purpose, either party may submit the matter to binding arbitration in San Diego in accordance with the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association. In the event airport operations cease to exist on the property leased to the authority pursuant to this section, control of the property will revert to the port as provided in Section 170060.

(3) All other terms of the ground lease shall be in accordance with reasonable commercial practice in the San Diego area for long-term real property ground leases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 158.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

170058.

Property adjacent to the San Diego International Airport, owned by the port, and commonly referred to as the “General Dynamics Property” shall continue to be operated by the port.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 978, Sec. 11.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170060.

(a) The port shall retain trusteeship of lands underlying the airport consistent with the State Lands Commission’s requirement and shall execute a 66-year lease with the authority for control of the airport property. The authority shall pay one dollar ($1) per year during the term of the lease, or until that time as airport operations controlled by the authority cease to exist on the property. At that time, the lease shall terminate and control of the property shall revert to the port.

(b) (1) The port may continue or enter into contracts, memorandums of understanding, or other agreements necessary to fulfill its
 responsibilities as trustee of the lands underlying the airport or adjacent lands under its control, or acquire additional lands within its jurisdiction consistent with its duties and pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 6001) of the Public Resources Code.

(2) (A) The port shall act as lead agency to certify any studies, reports, or other documents necessary to fulfill its obligations as trustee of the lands described in paragraph (1).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or any other provision of law, until the date that the port transfers the airport to the authority, the port and the authority, without the necessity of the giving of any notice, filing of any documents, or the taking of any other action, shall serve jointly as the lead agencies
 for the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) and regulations adopted thereto, including, but not limited to, the filing of notices of exemption, initial studies, negative declarations, and environmental impact reports. On and after the transfer date, the authority, without the necessity of the giving of any notice, filing of any documents, or the taking of any other action, is the sole lead agency for any documents for which an initial study has been commenced pursuant to Section 15063 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations or for which a notice of preparation has been issued pursuant to Section 15082 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, regardless of whether or not a notice of determination has been issued or a notice of completion has been issued.

(C) The lead agency status described in this paragraph is declaratory of existing law, and shall not in any respect be grounds for any claim or finding of noncompliance by the port or the authority, or both, with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or regulations adopted under that act.

(3) Lands acquired by or added to lands under its trusteeship by the port adjacent to the existing airport property and necessary to operate the airport, including, but not limited to, lands from the United States Marine Corp Recruit Depot for additional taxiways and other airport related facilities, shall be included in the lease to the authority as it is acquired by the port.

(c) The authority shall be responsible for making any necessary application to the California Coastal Commission pursuant to the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code) and to other agencies in accordance with other applicable laws in effect on the effective date of the act that added this section for improvements upon coastal lands under the control of the authority through a lease. The port shall assist in the application for those projects as the trustee of the lands and shall not impede any improvements sought in the fulfillment of the authority’s duties. The authority shall be responsible for all applications, requests, or submittals to other governmental agencies for approvals, permits, authorizations or agreements of any kind affecting or relating to the property governed by the lease, and the port shall cooperate in
 completion of all documents in the form submitted or approved by the authority without modification, providing the documents are requested by the authority, or required by any other governmental agencies, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 12.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170062.

(a) The authority may, in its sole discretion, from time to time, enter into agreements with the port for services including, but not limited to, operations, maintenance, and purchasing, as the authority may find necessary or beneficial to facilitate the operation of San Diego International Airport.

(b) The authority shall have no obligation to purchase or procure any services, facilities, or equipment from or through the port. At no time shall the authority be obligated to purchase auditing, public affairs, and governmental relations, strategic planning, legal, or board support services from the port. However, the authority may elect
 to obtain these services and support in agreement with the port.

(c) Performance of all these services shall be subject to the direction and control of the authority, and shall be provided in accordance with specifications, policies, and procedures as communicated by the authority to the port from time to time. In all cases, the port shall provide services of sufficient quality, quantity, reliability, and timeliness to ensure that the authority can continue the operation, maintenance, planning and improvement of and for San Diego International Airport consistent with the standards and practices under which the airport is operated on the effective date of the act that added this subparagraph or higher standards as the authority may adopt, or as may be required in the authority’s judgment to meet the requirements of federal or state law,
 or the needs of the users of the airport for the safe, secure, and efficient operation of the airport. The authority also, from time to time, may establish performance standards for and may conduct financial or performance audits, or both, of all services provided by the port and all charges or claims for payment for the services
 provided.

(d) Services provided by the Harbor Police shall in no event be of less quality than the standard established for airport police services by the three other largest airports, based on annual passengers, in this state. The port shall cooperate fully, at its own cost, in any financial or performance audit, or both, conducted by, or on behalf of, the authority or by any government agency having jurisdiction.

(e) The authority shall reimburse the port for the actual and reasonable direct costs, including, but not limited to, an appropriate allocation of general and administrative expenses associated with the provision of that service, incurred by the port to deliver services actually provided to the authority in accordance with the standards and requirements
 described in this section. The port shall request payment for services on a monthly basis. Those requests shall provide details regarding each service or element thereof for which payment is requested as the authority reasonably may request. The authority shall have the right to review and approve any request for payment for those services. Payment shall be due and payable 30 days after the request provided all necessary supporting documentation is received by the authority.

(f) The San Diego Harbor Police Department shall remain under the jurisdiction of the San Diego Unified Port District, and employees shall incur no loss of employment or reduction in wages, health and welfare benefits, seniority, retirement benefits or contributions made to retirement plans, or other terms and conditions of employment as a result of enactment of this
 division. The San Diego Harbor Police Department shall have the exclusive contract for law enforcement services at San Diego International Airport during that time as the airport continues to operate at Lindbergh Field, and peace officers of the Harbor Police shall remain employees of the port.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 13.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170064.

(a) From revenues in accounts attributable to airport operations, the port shall fund the authority for not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) each year until that time as the transfer of the airport and all associated revenue sources have been completed between the port and the authority. The authority’s board may submit a budget request for more than this amount if necessary to carry out its duties. The port shall approve those budget requests in a timely manner without modification or reduction. The authority shall report its total budget expenditure amount to the port on an annual basis and balance or carryover reserves from previous budgets. The funding provided by this subdivision replaces any
 loans made to the authority by the port under the former provisions set forth in this subdivision requiring the port to loan the authority the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) Upon the completion of the transfer of San Diego International Airport to the authority, the authority shall assume all revenue stream revenues to fund its activities, operations, and investments consistent with its purposes. The sources of revenue available to the authority may include, but are not limited to, imposing fees, rents, or other charges for facilities, services, the repayment of bonded indebtedness, and other expenditures consistent with the purposes of the authority.

(c) To the extent practicable, the authority shall endeavor to maximize the revenues generated from enterprises
 located on the property of the authority.

(d) The authority may receive state and federal grants for purposes of planning, constructing, and operating an airport and for providing ground access to airports under its control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 14.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170066.
